California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(C) When a person is admitted to Canyon Springs Community Facility pursuant to this paragraph, the regional center shall notify the clients’ rights advocate, as described in Section 4433, of
 the admission. A comprehensive assessment shall be completed by the regional center in coordination with Canyon Springs Community Facility staff. The comprehensive assessment shall include the identification of the services and supports needed for stabilization and the timeline for identifying or developing the services and supports needed to transition the consumer back to a community setting. Immediately following the comprehensive assessment, and not later than 30 days following admission, the regional center and staff at the Canyon Springs Community Facility shall jointly convene an individual program plan meeting to determine the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and to develop a plan to transition the consumer into community living pursuant to Section 4418.3. The clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of the individual program plan meeting and may participate in the individual program plan meeting unless the consumer objects on their own behalf.

(D) The population of consumers admitted pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed five. An admission to Canyon Springs Community Facility pursuant to this paragraph shall not extend beyond June 30, 2024, or the opening of completed and licensed complex needs homes identified in the safety net plan prepared pursuant to Section 4474.16 and approved for development in the Budget Act of 2023, whichever is earlier.

(E) For purposes of this paragraph, “acute psychiatric hospital” means a facility as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, including an institution for mental disease.

(6) (A) A person exercising the right of return described in Section 4508 on or before June 30, 2021.

(B) Prior to
 admission pursuant to this paragraph, the regional center shall prepare an assessment for inclusion in the consumer’s file detailing all considered community-based services and supports, including, but not limited to, rate adjustments as provided by law, supplemental services as set forth in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, emergency and crisis intervention services as set forth in paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 4648, community crisis home services pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 4698) of Chapter 6 of Division 4.5, and an explanation of why those options could not meet the consumer’s needs. Prior to admission, the Director of Developmental Services or the director’s designee shall certify that there are no community-based options that can meet the consumer’s needs.

(C) When a person is admitted pursuant to this paragraph, the regional center shall notify the clients’ rights
 advocate, as described in Section 4433, of the admission. A comprehensive assessment shall be completed by the regional center in coordination with developmental center staff. The comprehensive assessment shall include the identification of the services and supports needed for stabilization and the timeline for identifying or developing the services and supports needed to transition the consumer back to a community setting. Immediately following the comprehensive assessment, and not later than 30 days following admission, the regional center and staff at the developmental center shall jointly convene an individual program plan meeting to determine the services and supports needed for crisis stabilization and to develop a plan to transition the consumer into community living pursuant to Section 4418.3. The clients’ rights advocate for the regional center shall be notified of the individual program plan meeting and may participate in the individual program plan meeting unless the consumer objects on their own
 behalf.

(D) Notwithstanding Section 4508, the population of consumers admitted pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed five. An admission pursuant to this paragraph shall not extend beyond June 30, 2023.

(7) Committed by a court to Porterville Developmental Center, pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 due to an acute crisis, as described in Section 4418.7. The population of consumers admitted pursuant to this paragraph shall not exceed 10. An admission pursuant to this paragraph shall not extend beyond June 30, 2023, or upon the opening of the state-operated community acute crisis homes approved for development in the Budget Act of 2019.

(8) (A) Committed
 by a court pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 to a completed and licensed complex needs home identified in the safety net plan prepared pursuant to Section 4474.16 and approved for development in the Budget Act of 2023.

(B) When a person is admitted pursuant to this paragraph, the department and regional center shall comply with the requirements of Section 4418.8.

(b) A person admitted to the Canyon Springs Community Facility pursuant to paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a) shall be subject to enhanced monitoring that includes the following:

(1) Department clinical staff shall make monthly monitoring visits to observe the implementation of treatment
 plans.

(2) The department shall conduct monthly calls with regional centers to update transition planning and identify available placement options.

(3) The facility shall complete an initial transition plan within 60 days from admission.

(4) The facility shall conduct a transition review meeting 45 days prior to transitioning an individual from the facility.

(c) The State Department of Developmental Services shall not admit a person to a developmental center after July 1, 2012, as a result of a criminal conviction or when the person is competent to stand trial for the criminal offense and the admission is ordered in lieu of trial.

(d) Commencing with the first quarterly update to
 legislative staff after July 1, 2021, in the information provided pursuant to Section 4474.17, the State Department of Developmental Services shall provide a written update regarding efforts to reduce the reliance on Canyon Springs Community Facility for admissions due to an acute crisis, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 4418.7 and the development of additional community resources, including person-centered efforts. The update shall include data and descriptors of people admitted to Canyon Springs Community Facility in the previous year, including age and duration of stay to date, the status of transition planning meetings for those individuals, and their discharge status. For persons admitted to Canyon Springs Community Facility beginning July 1, 2022, the update shall include all alternative placement options examined for each person prior to admission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 192, Sec. 12.   (SB 138)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7506.

The primary purpose of each hospital for the developmentally disabled shall be the care, treatment and habilitation of those patients found suitable and duly admitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

7507.

Subject to the provisions of Sections 6509 and 7505, each developmental center shall admit persons duly committed or transferred thereto in accordance with law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 25, Sec. 33.   (AB 1472)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7509.

The State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Developmental Services shall prescribe and publish instructions and forms, in relation to the commitment and admission of patients, and may include in them any interrogatories as it deems necessary or useful. These instructions and forms shall be furnished to anyone applying therefor, and shall also be sent in sufficient numbers to the county clerks of the
 several counties of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 440, Sec. 74.   (AB 1488)   Effective September 22, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7513.

Each developmentally disabled person and his or her estate shall pay the State Department of Developmental Services for the cost of such person’s care and treatment as defined in Section 4431 while in a state hospital and while on leave of absence at state expense, less the sums payable therefor by the county. The provisions of Sections 7513.1 and 7513.2 shall govern the assessment, cancellation, collection, and remission of charges for such care and treatment.

This section shall not be construed to impose any liability on the parents of developmentally disabled persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7513.1.

The charge for the care and treatment of all developmentally disabled persons at state hospitals for the developmentally disabled for whom there is liability to pay therefor shall be determined pursuant to Section 4431. The Director of Developmental Services may reduce, cancel, or remit the amount to be paid by the person, estate, or the relative, as the case may be, liable for the care and treatment of any developmentally disabled person who is a patient at a state hospital for the developmentally disabled, on satisfactory proof that the person, estate, or relative, as the case may be, is unable to pay the cost of such care and treatment or that the amount is uncollectible.
 In any case where there has been a payment under this section, and such payment or any part thereof is refunded because of the death, leave of absence, or discharge of any patient of such hospital, such amount shall be paid by the hospital or the State Department of Developmental Services to the person who made the payment upon demand, and in the statement to the Controller the amounts refunded shall be itemized and the aggregate deducted from the amount to be paid into the State Treasury, as provided by law. If any person dies at any time while his or her estate is liable for his or her care and treatment at a state hospital, the claim for the amount due may be presented to the executor or administrator of his or her estate, and paid as a preferred claim, with the same rank in order of preference, as claims for expenses of last illness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7513.2.

The State Department of Developmental Services shall collect all the costs and charges mentioned in Section 7513 and may take such action as is necessary to effect their collection within or without the state. The Director of Developmental Services may, however, at his or her discretion, refuse to accept payment of charges for the care and treatment in a state hospital of any developmentally disabled person who is eligible for deportation by the federal immigration authorities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1142.)
-------------------------------------------

7514.

The State Department of Developmental Services may transfer any patient of a state hospital for the developmentally disabled to another state hospital for the developmentally disabled, at any time and from time to time, upon the application of the parent, guardian, conservator, or other person charged with the support of such patient, if the expenses of the transfer are paid by the applicant. The liability of any estate, person, or county for the care, support and maintenance of such patient in the institution to which he is transferred shall be the same as if he had originally been committed to such institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

7515.

The medical director may, with the approval of the department having jurisdiction, cause the peremptory discharge of any person who has been a patient for the period of one month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 699.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

7516.

Nothing in this division contained interferes with or affects the status of such patients as are now in the Sonoma State Hospital under terms of life tenure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

7518.

In accordance with this section, the medical director of a state hospital with programs for developmentally disabled patients, as defined in Section 4512, may give consent to medical, dental, and surgical treatment of a minor developmentally disabled patient of the hospital and provide for such treatment to be given to the patient.

If the patient’s parent, guardian, or conservator legally authorized to consent to such treatment, does not respond within a reasonable time to the request of the medical director for the granting or denying of consent for such treatment, the medical director may consent, on behalf of the patient, to such
 treatment and provide for such treatment to be given to the patient.

If the patient has no parent, guardian, or conservator legally authorized to consent to medical, dental, or surgical treatment on behalf of the patient, the medical director may consent to such treatment on behalf of the patient and provide for such treatment to be given to the patient. The medical director may immediately thereupon also request the appropriate regional center for the developmentally disabled to initiate or cause to be initiated proceedings for the appointment of a guardian or conservator legally authorized to consent to medical, dental, or surgical treatment.

If the patient is an adult and has no conservator, consent to treatment may be given by someone other than the patient on the patient’s behalf only if the patient is mentally incapable of giving his own consent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Langley Porter Neuropsychiatric Institute [7600. - 7600.]

7600.

The Department of General Services shall grant to the Regents of the University of California in fee simple all of its right, title and interest in the land adjacent to the campus of the University of California Medical School Center, San Francisco, at no cost to the regents, upon which the Langley Porter Neuropsychiatric Institute is located, for the purpose of integrating the institute into the total educational system of the University of California.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1593.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. The Neuropsychiatric Institute, University of California at Los Angeles Medical Center [7700. - 7700.]

7700.

A neuropsychiatric hospital for which an appropriation for planning was provided by Item 328.1 of the Budget Act of 1954, hereafter referred to as the institute, shall be established on the grounds belonging to the Regents of the University of California at Los Angeles as a part of the medical center. The institute shall be integrated into the total educational system of the University of California.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1593.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. MISCELLANEOUS [8050. - 8266.]



CHAPTER 2. Research Concerning Sexual Deviation and Sex Crimes [8050. - 8053.]

8050.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall plan, conduct, and cause to be conducted scientific research into sex crimes against children and into methods of identifying those who commit sexual offenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 199.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8051.

Upon the recommendation of the superintendent of the Langley Porter Clinic, the State Department of State Hospitals may enter into contracts with the Regents of the University of California for the conduct, by either for the other, of all or any portion of the research provided for in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 200.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8052.

Each state agency shall cooperate with the superintendent of the Langley Porter Clinic, or with the University of California, as the case may be, to the fullest extent that its facilities will permit without interfering with the carrying out of its primary purposes and functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

8053.

The State Department of State Hospitals with the approval of the Director of Finance may accept gifts or grants from any source for the accomplishment of the objects and purposes of this chapter. The provisions of Section 16302 of the Government Code do not apply to such gifts or grants and the money so received shall be expended to carry out the purposes of this chapter, subject to any limitation contained in such gift or
 grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 201.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Firearms [8100. - 8108.]

8100.

(a) A person shall not have in his or her possession or under his or her custody or control, or purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms whatsoever or any other deadly weapon, if on or after January 1, 1992, he or she has been admitted to a facility and is receiving inpatient treatment and, in the opinion of the attending health professional who is primarily responsible for the
 patient’s treatment of a mental disorder, is a danger to self or others, as specified by Section 5150, 5250, or 5300, even though the patient has consented to that treatment. A person is not subject to the prohibition in this subdivision after he or she is discharged from the facility.

(b) (1) A person shall not have in his or her possession or under his or her custody or control, or purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, any firearms whatsoever or any other deadly weapon for a period of five years if, on or after January 1, 2014, he or she communicates to a licensed psychotherapist, as defined in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 1010 of the Evidence Code, a serious threat of physical violence against a reasonably identifiable victim or victims. The five-year period shall commence from the date that the licensed psychotherapist reports to the local law enforcement agency the identity of the
 person making the communication. The prohibition provided for in this subdivision shall not apply unless the licensed psychotherapist notifies a local law enforcement agency of the threat by that person. The person, however, may own, possess, have custody or control over, or receive or purchase any firearm if a superior court, pursuant to paragraph (3) and upon petition of the person, has found, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the person is likely to use firearms or other deadly weapons in a safe and lawful manner.

(2) Upon receipt of the report from the local law enforcement agency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 8105, the Department of Justice shall notify by certified mail, return receipt requested, a person subject to this subdivision of the following:

(A) That he or she is prohibited from possessing, having custody or control over, receiving, or purchasing any
 firearm or other deadly weapon for a period of five years commencing from the date that the licensed psychotherapist reports to the local law enforcement agency the identity of the person making the communication. The notice shall state the date when the prohibition commences and ends.

(B) That he or she may petition a court, as provided in this subdivision, for an order permitting the person to own, possess, control, receive, or purchase a firearm.

(3) (A) Any person who is subject to paragraph (1) may petition the superior court of his or her county of residence for an order that he or she may own, possess, have custody or control over, receive, or purchase firearms. At the time the petition is filed, the clerk of the court shall set a hearing date and notify the person, the Department of Justice, and the district attorney. The people of the State of
 California shall be the respondent in the proceeding and shall be represented by the district attorney. Upon motion of the district attorney, or upon its own motion, the superior court may transfer the petition to the county in which the person resided at the time of the statements, or the county in which the person made the statements. Within seven days after receiving notice of the petition, the Department of Justice shall file copies of the reports described in Section 8105 with the superior court. The reports shall be disclosed upon request to the person and to the district attorney. The district attorney shall be entitled to a continuance of the hearing to a date of not less than 14 days after the district attorney is notified of the hearing date by the clerk of the court. The court, upon motion of the petitioner establishing that confidential information is likely to be discussed during the hearing that would cause harm to the person, shall conduct the hearing in camera with only the relevant parties
 present, unless the court finds that the public interest would be better served by conducting the hearing in public. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, declarations, police reports, including criminal history information, and any other material and relevant evidence that is not excluded under Section 352 of the Evidence Code, shall be admissible at the hearing under this paragraph.

(B) The people shall bear the burden of showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the person would not be likely to use firearms in a safe and lawful manner.

(C) If the court finds at the hearing that the people have not met their burden as set forth in subparagraph (B), the court shall order that the person shall not be subject to the five-year prohibition in this section on the ownership, control, receipt, possession, or purchase of firearms, and that person shall comply with the
 procedure described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code for the return of any firearms. A copy of the order shall be submitted to the Department of Justice. Upon receipt of the order, the Department of Justice shall delete any reference to the prohibition against firearms from the person’s state mental health firearms prohibition system information.

(D) If the district attorney declines or fails to go forward in the hearing, the court shall order that the person shall not be subject to the five-year prohibition required by this subdivision on the ownership, control, receipt, possession, or purchase of firearms, and that person shall comply with the procedure described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code for the return of any firearms. A copy of the order shall be submitted to the Department of Justice. Upon receipt of
 the order, the Department of Justice shall, within 15 days, delete any reference to the prohibition against firearms from the person’s state mental health firearms prohibition system information.

(E) Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the use of reports filed pursuant to this section to determine the eligibility of a person to own, possess, control, receive, or purchase a firearm if the person is the subject of a criminal investigation, a part of which involves the ownership, possession, control, receipt, or purchase of a firearm.

(c) “Discharge,” for the purposes of this section, does not include a leave of absence from a facility.

(d) “Attending health care professional,” as used in this section, means the licensed health care professional primarily responsible for the person’s treatment who is qualified to
 make the decision that the person has a mental disorder and has probable cause to believe that the person is a danger to self or others.

(e) “Deadly weapon,” as used in this section and in Sections 8101, 8102, and 8103, means any weapon, the possession or concealed carrying of which is prohibited by any provision listed in Section 16590 of the Penal Code.

(f) “Danger to self,” as used in subdivision (a), means a voluntary person who has made a serious threat of, or attempted, suicide with the use of a firearm or other deadly weapon.

(g) A violation of subdivision (a) of, or paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, this section shall be a public offense, punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for not more than one year, by a fine not exceeding one
 thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(h) The prohibitions set forth in this section shall be in addition to those set forth in Section 8103.

(i) Any person admitted and receiving treatment prior to January 1, 1992, shall be governed by this section, as amended by Chapter 1090 of the Statutes of 1990, until discharged from the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   (AB 1131)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8101.

(a) Any person who shall knowingly supply, sell, give, or allow possession or control of a deadly weapon to any person described in Section 8100 or 8103 shall be punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or in a county jail for a period of not exceeding one year, by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both
 the fine and imprisonment.

(b) Any person who shall knowingly supply, sell, give, or allow possession or control of a firearm to any person described in Section 8100 or 8103 shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years.

(c) “Deadly weapon,” as used in this section has the meaning prescribed by Section 8100.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 627.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

8102.

(a) Whenever a person, who has been detained or apprehended for examination of his or her mental condition or who is a person described in Section 8100 or 8103, is found to own, have in his or her possession or under his or her control, any firearm whatsoever, or any other deadly weapon, the firearm or other deadly weapon shall be confiscated by any law enforcement agency or peace officer, who shall retain
 custody of the firearm or other deadly weapon.

“Deadly weapon,” as used in this section, has the meaning prescribed by Section 8100.

(b) (1) Upon confiscation of any firearm or other deadly weapon from a person who has been detained or apprehended for examination of his or her mental condition, the peace officer or law enforcement agency shall issue a receipt describing the deadly weapon or any firearm and listing any serial number or other identification on the firearm and shall notify the person of the procedure for the return, sale, transfer, or destruction of any firearm or other deadly weapon which has been confiscated. A peace officer or law enforcement agency that provides the receipt and notification described in Section 33800 of the Penal Code satisfies the receipt and notice requirements.

(2) If the person
 is released, the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her designee, shall notify the person of the procedure for the return of any firearm or other deadly weapon which may have been confiscated.

 (3) Health facility personnel shall notify the confiscating law enforcement agency upon release of the detained person, and shall make a notation to the effect that the facility provided the required notice to the person regarding the procedure to obtain return of any confiscated firearm.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, the procedure for the return, sale, or transfer of confiscated firearms includes the procedures described in this section and the procedures described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(5) In lieu of destroying a
 firearm that has been confiscated pursuant to this section that is a nuisance, unclaimed, abandoned, or otherwise subject to destruction, a law enforcement agency may retain or transfer the firearm as provided in Section 34005 of the Penal Code.

(c) Upon the release of a person as described in subdivision (b), the confiscating law enforcement agency shall have 30 days to initiate a petition in the superior court for a hearing to determine whether the return of a firearm or other deadly weapon would be likely to result in endangering the person or others, and to send a notice advising the person of his or her right to a hearing on this issue. The law enforcement agency may make an ex parte application stating good cause for an order extending the time to file a petition. Including any extension of time granted in response to an ex parte request, a petition shall be filed within 60 days of the release of the person from a health facility.

(d) If the law enforcement agency does not initiate proceedings within the 30-day period, or the period of time authorized by the court in an ex parte order issued pursuant to subdivision (c), it shall make the weapon available for return upon compliance with all applicable requirements, including the requirements specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 33850) of Division 11 of Title 4 of Part 6 of the Penal Code.

(e) The law enforcement agency shall inform the person that he or she has 30 days to respond to the court clerk to confirm his or her desire for a hearing, and that the failure to respond will result in a default order forfeiting the confiscated firearm or weapon. For a confiscated firearm, the period of forfeiture is 180 days pursuant to Section 33875 of the Penal Code, unless the person contacts the law enforcement agency to facilitate the sale or transfer of the
 firearm to a licensed dealer pursuant to Section 33870 of the Penal Code. For the purpose of this subdivision, the person’s last known address shall be the address provided to the law enforcement officer by the person at the time of the person’s detention or apprehension.

(f) If the person responds and requests a hearing, the court clerk shall set a hearing, no later than 30 days from receipt of the request. The court clerk shall notify the person and the district attorney of the date, time, and place of the hearing.

(g) If the person does not respond within 30 days of the notice, the law enforcement agency may file a petition for order of default, allowing the law enforcement agency to destroy the firearm in 180 days from the date the court enters default unless the person contacts the law enforcement agency to facilitate the sale or transfer of the firearm to a licensed dealer
 pursuant to Section 33870 of the Penal Code.

(h) If, after a hearing, the court determines that the return of the firearm or other deadly weapon would likely endanger the person or others, the law enforcement agency may destroy the firearm within 180 days from the date that the court makes that determination, unless the person contacts the law enforcement agency to facilitate the sale or transfer of the firearm to a licensed dealer pursuant to Section 33870 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 747, Sec. 2.   (AB 1131)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.

(a) (1) A person who after October 1, 1955, has been adjudicated by a court of any state to be a danger to others as a result of a mental disorder or mental illness, or who has been adjudicated to be a mentally disordered sex offender, shall not purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, or have possession, custody, or control of a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition unless there has been issued to the person a certificate by the court of adjudication upon release from treatment or at a later date stating that the person may possess a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition without endangering others, and the person has not, subsequent to the issuance of the certificate, again been adjudicated by a court to be a danger to others as a result of a mental disorder
 or mental illness.

(2) The court shall notify the Department of Justice of the court order finding the individual to be a person described in paragraph (1) as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after issuing the order. The court shall also notify the department of a certificate issued as described in paragraph (1) as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after issuing the certificate.

(3) A person described in paragraph (1) shall, in accordance with applicable state law and local procedure, relinquish to law enforcement a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition in their custody or control within 14 days of a court order finding the person to be a person described in paragraph (1) and submit a receipt to the court to show proof of relinquishment.

(b) (1) A person
 who has been found, pursuant to Section 1026 of the Penal Code or the law of any other state or the United States, not guilty by reason of insanity of murder, mayhem, a violation of Section 207, 209, or 209.5 of the Penal Code in which the victim suffers intentionally inflicted great bodily injury, carjacking or robbery in which the victim suffers great bodily injury, a violation of Section 451 or 452 of the Penal Code involving a trailer coach, as defined in Section 635 of the Vehicle Code, or a dwelling house, a violation of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a) of former Section 262 of the Penal Code or paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 261 of the Penal Code, a violation of Section 459 of the Penal Code in the first degree, assault with intent to commit murder, a violation of Section 220 of the Penal Code in which the victim suffers great bodily injury, a violation of Section 18715, 18725, 18740, 18745, 18750, or 18755 of the Penal Code, or of a felony involving death, great bodily
 injury, or an act which poses a serious threat of bodily harm to another person, or a violation of the law of any other state or the United States that includes all the elements of any of the above felonies as defined under California law, shall not purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, or have possession, custody, or control of a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition.

(2) The court shall notify the Department of Justice of the court order finding the person to be a person described in paragraph (1) as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after issuing the order.

(3) A person described in paragraph (1) shall, in accordance with applicable state law and local procedure, relinquish to law enforcement a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition in their custody or control within 14 days of the court order finding the person to be a person
 described in paragraph (1) and submit a receipt to the court to show proof of relinquishment.

(c) (1) A person who has been found, pursuant to Section 1026 of the Penal Code or the law of any other state or the United States, not guilty by reason of insanity of a crime other than those described in subdivision (b) shall not purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, or have possession, custody, or control of a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition unless the court of commitment has found the person to have recovered sanity, pursuant to Section 1026.2 of the Penal Code or the law of any other state or the United States.

(2) The court shall notify the Department of Justice of the court order finding the person to be a person described in paragraph (1) as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after issuing the order. The court
 shall also notify the Department of Justice when it finds that the person has recovered their sanity as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after making the finding.

(3) A person described in paragraph (1) shall, in accordance with applicable state law and local procedure, relinquish to law enforcement a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition in their custody or control within 14 days of the court order finding the person to be a person described in paragraph (1) and submit a receipt to the court to show proof of relinquishment.

(d) (1) A person found by a court to be mentally incompetent to stand trial, pursuant to Section 1370, 1370.02, or 1370.1 of the Penal Code or the law of any other state or the United States, shall not purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, or have possession, custody, or control of a firearm,
 other deadly weapon, or ammunition unless there has been a finding with respect to the person of restoration to competence to stand trial by the committing court, pursuant to Section 1372 of the Penal Code or the law of any other state or the United States.

(2) The court shall notify the Department of Justice of any court order finding a person to be mentally incompetent to stand trial as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after issuing the order. The court shall also notify the Department of Justice when it finds that the person has recovered competence as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after making the finding.

(e) (1) A person who has been placed under conservatorship by a court, pursuant to Section 5350 or the law of any other state or the United States, because the person is gravely disabled as a result of a mental
 disorder or impairment by chronic alcoholism, shall not purchase or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive, or have possession, custody, or control of a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition while under the conservatorship if, at the time the conservatorship was ordered or thereafter, the court that imposed the conservatorship found that possession of a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition by the person would present a danger to the safety of the person or to others. Upon placing a person under conservatorship, and prohibiting firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition possession by the person, the court shall notify the person of this prohibition.

(2) The court shall notify the Department of Justice of the court order placing the person under conservatorship and prohibiting firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition possession by the person, as described in paragraph (1), as soon as possible, but not later than one court day
 after placing the person under conservatorship. The notice shall include the date the conservatorship was imposed and the date the conservatorship is to be terminated. If the conservatorship is subsequently terminated before the date listed in the notice to the Department of Justice or the court subsequently finds that possession of a firearm, other deadly weapon, or ammunition by the person would no longer present a danger to the safety of the person or others, the court shall notify the Department of Justice as soon as possible, but not later than one court day after terminating the conservatorship.
